Connecticut, session 2026, SB00146.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (e) of section 26-47 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section,
the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection may issue
permits for the taking of wildlife that threatens or causes damage to
agricultural crops, livestock or apiaries, or that caused damage to crops
during the preceding growing season, as verified by the Department of
Energy and Environmental Protection if: (1) The owner or lessee of the
subject property utilized reasonable nonlethal efforts to protect such
[crops,] apiaries or livestock, including, but not limited to, electric
fencing, animal guardians or fortified enclosed structures, and (2) an
investigation by Department of Energy and Environmental Protection
personnel determines that the taking of such wildlife is necessary to
protect agricultural crops, apiaries or livestock from excessive damage
and that reasonable nonlethal efforts to protect such [crops,] apiaries or
livestock have not been or are not likely to be successful in preventing
further damage. Any such permit issued pursuant to this subsection
shall specify the means, methods and times for which such take is
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 146
allowed and shall only be issued by the commissioner to the: (A) Owner
of the subject property on which such excessive damage occurred, (B)
agent of such owner, or (C) lessee of such subject property, provided
such lessee has the written permission of such owner to take wildlife.
No application for a permit pursuant to this section shall require
notarization. Any wildlife taken pursuant to this section shall be
disposed of as directed by the department. The provisions of this
subsection shall not be construed to authorize the taking of any federally
protected species.
Sec. 2. Subsection (c) of section 26-80a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent any person
from using deadly physical force to kill a bear if such person reasonably
believes that a bear is: (1) Inflicting or is about to inflict great bodily
harm to a human, (2) injuring or killing such person's pet or livestock
that is otherwise controlled in accordance with any applicable provision
of the general statutes or any regulation adopted pursuant to such a
provision, or (3) entering a building occupied by persons.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage 26-47(e)
Sec. 2 from passage 26-80a(c)
ENV Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2